Maryland, session 2026, HB1503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1503*

HOUSE BILL 1503
9–601.
This subtitle applies to Carroll County.
9–605.
(A) IN ADDITION TO A PLANNING COMMISSION APPOINTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH TITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OF CARROLL
COUNTY MAY ENACT A LOCAL LAW TO:
(1) DIVIDE THE COUNTY INTO DISTRICTS OF ANY NUMBER, SHAPE, OR
AREA IT MAY DETERMINE; AND
(2) ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR THE APPOINTMENT OF ONE OR MORE
DISTRICT PLANNING COMMISSIONS TO PREPARE AND IMPLEMENT PLANS FOR A
DISTRICT;
(3) PROVIDE FOR THE MEMBERSHIP AND TERM OF A DISTRICT
PLANNING COMMISSION; AND
(4) PROVIDE FOR THE ABOLISHMENT OF A DISTRICT PLANNING
COMMISSION AT ANY TIME AND FOR ANY REASON.
(B) (1) THE DISTRICT PLANNING COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE SAME
POWERS AND DUTIES WITH REGARD TO THE DISTRICT AS A COUNTY PLANNING
COMMISSION ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) THE DISTRICT PLANNING COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) DEVELOP PLANS AND REGULATIONS FOR THE ZONING,
SUBDIVISION, AND PROVISION OF FACILITIES AND SERVICES TO THE DISTRICT FOR
THE ORDERLY GROWTH OF THE DISTRICT;
(II) HOLD PUBLIC HEARINGS; AND
(III) SUBMIT THE PROPOSED PLANS AND REGULATIONS,
INCLUDING THE FULL TEXT OF ANY ZONING REGULATIONS AND MAPS, TO THE
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OF CARROLL COUNTY FOR APPROVAL.
(C) ZONING REGULATIONS ADOPTED FOR A DISTRICT SHALL BE
ADMINISTERED WITHIN THE DISTRICT IN THE SAME MANNER AS ALL OTHER LAND
USE REGULATIONS OF THE COUNTY OR AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THE DISTRICT
ZONE REGULATIONS.

HOUSE BILL 1503 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.